Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 2

Administrative Departments Generally

25-2-101. Legislative findings and purpose — Construction.

The General Assembly declares that this act is necessary:

It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide for an orderly transfer of powers, duties, and functions of the various state agencies to the principal departments with a minimum of disruption of governmental services and functions and with a minimum of expense.

To the ends stated in this section, this act shall be liberally construed.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-901.

25-2-102. Certain professional boards excepted.

Nothing in this act shall apply to state boards that license the professions of the healing arts under the following statutes:

Chiropractics, § 17-81-101 et seq.;

Dentistry, § 17-82-101 et seq.;

Medicine and surgery, § 17-95-201 et seq.;

Nursing, § 17-87-101 et seq.;

Optometry, § 17-90-101 et seq.;

Pharmacy, § 17-92-101 et seq.;

Physical therapy, § 17-93-101 et seq.;

Podiatry, § 17-96-101 et seq.;

Psychology, § 17-97-201 et seq.;

Massage therapy, § 17-86-101 et seq.; or

Veterinary medicine, § 17-101-101 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. The references to the code sections in Title 17 have been updated to reflect the 1995 realphabetization of the chapters in that title.

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-2-101.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-917.

25-2-103. Effect of act on preexisting rules, regulations, etc.

This act shall not affect the orders, rules, regulations, and standards made or promulgated before February 4, 1971, by any department, institution, division, bureau, board, commission, council, or other agency, the functions, powers, and duties of which have been herein assigned or transferred to a principal department established by this act. The orders, rules, regulations, and standards shall continue with full force and effect until amended or repealed pursuant to law.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 17 [17A]; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-918.

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-2-101.

25-2-104. Type 1 transfers.

When any department, institution, or other agency, or part thereof, is transferred to a principal department under a type 1 transfer, that department, institution, or other agency, or part thereof, shall be administered under the direction and supervision of that principal department but shall retain exactly the same prescribed statutory powers, authorities, duties, and functions as it had prior to the transfer, including:

Rulemaking, regulation, licensing, and registration;

The promulgation of rules, rates, and standards; and

The rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications.

It shall exercise those powers, authorities, duties, and functions independently of the head of the principal department.

Following a type 1 transfer, the members of any statutory board or commission so transferred, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the board or commission as such statutes may from time to time be amended.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, under a type 1 transfer, all budgeting, purchasing, and related management functions of any transferred department, institution, or other agency, or part thereof, shall be performed under the direction and supervision of the head of the principal department.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1971, No. 38, § 3, provided that any then-existing board, commission, advisory board, or other entity not enumerated in the reorganization act, but established by law within, or advisory to, a department, institution, or other agency would continue to exercise all its powers, duties, and functions under the principal department in accordance with the type of transfer under which the preexisting department, institution, or other agency was transferred.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 18, provided that the act would not affect any civil or criminal actions or proceedings which were pending on February 4, 1971, and which involved any agency transferred to a principal department. It further provided that any order, recommendation, or other proceeding by such an agency would not be affected by the reorganization.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “regulations” following “rates” in (a)(1)(B).

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-2-101.

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-2-101.

Cited: State Office of Child Support Enforcement v. Harnage, 322 Ark. 461, 910 S.W.2d 207 (1995).

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-2-101.

When all or part of any department, institution, or other agency is transferred to a principal department under a type 4 transfer, the board, commission, or other governing body of the transferred department, institution, or other agency is retained and shall continue to exercise its statutory authority, powers, duties, and functions;

The director of the department, institution, or other agency shall be nominated by the board or commission or governing body of the transferred department, institution, or other agency subject to confirmation by the Governor. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor; and

All records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds, including the functions of budgeting and purchasing, are transferred to the principal department.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted “except that any rules, regulations, and standards issued by the board, commission, or other governing body shall be subject to written approval by the Governor” at the end of (a)(1).

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-2-101.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 2; 1985, No. 348, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-902; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2910.

25-2-105. Type 2 transfers.

Under this act, a type 2 transfer means the transferring of all or part of an existing department, institution, or other agency to a principal department established by this act. When all or part of any department, institution, or other agency is transferred to a principal department under a type 2 transfer, its statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the principal department.

When any department, institution, or other agency, or part thereof, is transferred by a type 2 transfer to a principal department under the provisions of this act, its prescribed powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing; promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards; and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the head of the principal department into which the department, institution, or other agency, or part thereof, has been transferred.

Following a type 2 transfer, the members of any statutory board or commission so transferred, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to that board or commission as such statutes may from time to time be amended.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 2; 1985, No. 348, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-902.

25-2-106. Type 3 transfers.

Under this act, a type 3 transfer means the abolishing of an existing department, institution, or other agency and the transferring of all or part of its powers, duties, and functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds to a principal department as specified under this act.

When any department, institution, or other agency, or part thereof, is transferred by a type 3 transfer to a principal department under the provisions of this act, its prescribed powers, duties, and functions including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing; promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards; and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the head of the principal department into which the department, institution, or other agency, or part thereof, has been transferred.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-902.

25-2-107. Type 4 transfers.

Under this act, a type 4 transfer means the transferring of all or part of an existing department, institution, or other agency to a principal department established by this act in the following circumstances:

Following a type 4 transfer, the members of any statutory board or commission so transferred and their successors shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the board or commission as such statutes may from time to time be amended.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 2; 1985, No. 348, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-902; Acts 2011, No. 603, § 1.

25-2-108. Reports, certifications, etc., to transferred agency.

Unless specifically provided otherwise in this act or by any operative law, whenever, pursuant to existing law, reports, certifications, applications, or requests are required or permitted to be made to a department, institution, division, bureau, board, commission, council, or other agency whose powers and duties are herein assigned or transferred by a type 2, 3, or 4 transfer, then those reports and certifications shall thereafter be filed with, and the applications or requests shall thereafter be made to, the principal department or agency to which assignment or transfer has been made.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-920.

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-2-101.

25-2-109. Senatorial confirmation of certain appointments.

Irrespective of other provisions of this act to the contrary, if the laws in effect on the date of the passage of this act required senatorial confirmation of the appointment of any board or commission member, or of the head of any agency or department of government, or of any head of a division of an agency or department of government, and that board, commission, agency, or department is consolidated or merged with a principal department under this act, then the appointments requiring confirmation shall be made as provided in this act with respect to all agencies merged or consolidated into a principal department by a type 1, 2, 3, or 4 transfer.

It is the intent of this act, with respect to all affairs of government which are under the administrative control or responsibility of any official of government whose appointment was subject to senatorial confirmation prior to the passage of this act, that the head of the successor department or the head of the division within the successor department into which the agency or program was merged shall be subject to confirmation of the Senate.

Publisher's Notes. With reference to the phrase “date of the passage of this act,” Acts 1971, No. 38, § 21, was approved by the Governor and became effective on February 4, 1971.

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-2-101.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2016, No. 253, § 27, provided: “NATURAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES COUNCIL. The Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage shall be the disbursing officer for the Natural and Cultural Resources Council appropriation and the Main Street Program appropriation provided by this Act. Further, if grants are made to state agencies from the Natural and Cultural Resources Council appropriation, and the Main Street Program appropriation provided herein, the corresponding amount of appropriation and funding of such grant may be transferred to such state agency for use in classifications of expenditures as determined by conditions of the grant and the state agency.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2017, No. 921, § 1, provided: “TEMPORARY LANGUAGE.

“(a)The Department of Arkansas Heritage shall conduct a study to determine the feasibility of establishing the Arkansas Civil War museum.

“(b)The feasibility study shall include an assessment of:

“(1)Market, including without limitation:

“(A)A study of the demand and interest in Civil War tourism in Arkansas;

“(B)The target markets for a Civil War Museum in Arkansas, considering demographic and geographic characteristics; and

“(C)Proposed locations for a Civil War Museum;

“(2)Organization and technological requirements, including without limitation:

“(A)A study of qualifications needed to manage and operate a Civil War museum;

“(B)Staffing requirements; and

“(C)Special technology, equipment, and collection needs for startup and maintenance; and

“(3)Financial analysis, including without limitation:

“(A)An assessment of startup costs and operating costs;

“(B)Potential revenue projections; and

“(C)Possible funding sources.

“(c)(1)The feasibility study shall be completed no later than July 1, 2018.

“(2)After completion of the feasibility study, the department shall furnish a feasibility report to the Legislative Council that includes its recommendation concerning the establishment of the Arkansas Civil War Museum.”

Cross References. Historic preservation, statewide program of, §13-7-101 et seq.

Preambles. Acts 1975, No. 1001 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, Arkansas is a State rich in cultural resources; and

“Whereas, there now exists numerous culturally oriented agencies and programs in the various departments of this government;

“Now, therefore, the Legislature of the State of Arkansas recognizes the need for a statewide program devoted to the development of the natural and cultural heritage of the State of Arkansas, and enacts this measure for the achievement of that purpose….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1975, No. 1001, §§ 9, 10: Apr. 11, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is a need for a State-wide program devoted to the development of the cultural heritage of the State of Arkansas, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order that the reorganization contemplated by this Act may be accomplished on or before July 1, 1975. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 346, § 45: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1985 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1985 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 9, § 60: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1995, No. 531, § 70: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “ It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 19: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that this act makes various technical corrections in the Arkansas Code; that this act further clarifies the law to provide that the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may correct errors resulting from enactments of prior sessions; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to be applicable during the codification process of the enactments of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

To create a structure of state government which will be responsive to the cultural needs of the people of this state and sufficiently flexible to meet changing conditions;

To provide for greater budgetary and administrative efficiencies within an orderly organizational structure of government;

To encourage greater participation of the public in the cultural affairs of the state;

To effect the grouping of culturally oriented state agencies and programs into one (1) department; and

To eliminate overlapping and duplication of effort.

To the ends stated in this section, this act shall be liberally construed.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” in (b).

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 1975, No. 1001, codified as §§25-3-101 —25-3-104.

Each agency or program of the division shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the division. The director may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to the head of any agency or program of the division as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the division.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1975, No. 1001, § 4, which enacted this section, created a Department of Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage. Acts 1985, No. 346, § 42, renamed the department as the Department of Arkansas Heritage.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section; substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a); added the (b)(1) and (b)(2) designations; added (b)(3); substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (b)(1); and inserted “and the secretary” in the first sentence of (c).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)The General Assembly finds:

“(1)State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning transfers into the Department of Arkansas Heritage, was repealed by identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 125. The section was derived from Acts 1975, No. 1001, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-924.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas Heritage;

The Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission;

The Director of State Highways and Transportation;

The Secretary of the Department of Health;

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;

The Director of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;

A person appointed by the Governor;

A person appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and

A person appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

One (1) member shall serve a term of one (1) year;

One (1) member shall serve a term of two (2) years; and

One (1) member shall serve a term of three (3) years.

The committee shall elect from its membership a chair and vice-chair.

A vacancy on the committee in the positions appointed by the Governor, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be filled by the appointing authority for the unexpired portion of the term in which it occurs.

A majority of the total membership of the committee constitutes a quorum.

Members of the committee appointed by the Governor, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and Speaker of the House of Representatives may receive expense reimbursement and stipends under § 25-16-901 et seq. as allowed by law.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendment substituted “The Director of State Highways and Transportation” for “The Director of the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation department” in (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a)(1); deleted “Executive” preceding “Director” in (a)(2); substituted “Secretary of the Department of Health” for “Director of the Department of Health” in (a)(4); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a)(5).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage through the Central Administration Division” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage through its Central Administration Division” in (a).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in the first sentence, and, in the second sentence, substituted the first occurrence of “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage”, substituted the second occurrence of “Central Administration Division” for “division”, and substituted the second occurrence of “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “department”.

Cross References. Publication Development and Resale Revolving Fund, §19-5-1001.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning restriction on printing expenditures, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1276, § 2 The section was derived from Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 9, § 52.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §25-3-108, concerning the establishment and operation of a heritage foundation, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1987, No. 547, §§ 45-47.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted“Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a) and (c); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Cross References. Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act, §4-28-201 et seq.

Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act of 1993, §4-33-101 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning compensation for extra help, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 13. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 531, § 61.

Effective Dates. Acts 1977, No. 884, § 26: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-First General Assembly that the establishment of a Department of Computer Services within the Executive Department of Government is necessary to ensure the most efficient use of data processing and telecommunications systems within State government. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1979, No. 796, § 9: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1979 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1979, would work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1979, No. 820, § 4: Apr. 10, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found by the General Assembly that coordination of acquisitions of data processing equipment or services by public colleges or universities is important to the effective expenditure of public funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 951, § 1: Apr. 17, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that clarification of the purposes for which the Reserve for Equipment may be used and establishment of the Computer Services Reserve Fund are necessary for efficient use and administration of such accumulated funds. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 463, § 4: Mar. 21, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found by the General Assembly that coordination of acquisitions of data processing equipment or services by public colleges or universities and post-secondary vocational-technical schools is important to the effective expenditure of public funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 914, § 35: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly that continuing advances in the field of communications and information technology make it necessary to establish a Department of Information Systems within the Executive Department of Government to better coordinate and utilize such technology; and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1997, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2001, No. 1722, § 19: Apr. 17, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act 1042 of 2001 was enacted with an emergency clause; that this act makes changes to current law that are necessitated by Act 1042 of 2001; and that this law should become effective as soon as possible in order to complement and implement Act 1042 of 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1627, § 15: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2003 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2003 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2007, No. 751, § 38: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act dissolves and transfers the duties of the Executive Chief Information Officer, Chief Information Officer, and Office of Information Technology; and that dissolving the offices at the beginning of the state's fiscal year will result in a more efficient transfer of responsibilities and funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 1405, § 57: Apr. 9, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of the State of Arkansas overwhelmingly approved the establishment of lotteries at the 2008 General Election; that the Eighty-seventh General Assembly adopted Acts 605 and 606 of 2009 that implemented lotteries and made corresponding revisions to the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program; that this bill amends provisions of Acts 605 and 606 of 2009 pertaining to lotteries and the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program; and that the failure to immediately implement this act will cause a reduction in lottery proceeds that will harm the educational and economic success of potential students eligible to receive scholarships under the act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 218, § 34: Feb. 26, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the stability of the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery is critical to the success of the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program; that changes to the operational structure of the lottery are needed to improve the creditability and function of the lottery; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that the transition of lottery administration is as undisruptive as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-922.